Missouri, session 2026, HB1880.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 167, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 167.209, to read as follows:
167.209. No school district or charter school that receives state aid under chapter
2 163 or any other state moneys shall sell drinks that contain more than one hundred
3 milligrams of caffeine per container to children enrolled in such school district or
4 charter school.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.